Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB833.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All students admitted to the common schools shall comply with the lawful
regulations for the government of the schools:
(a) Willful disobedience or defiance of the authority of the teachers or
administrators, use of profanity or vulgarity, assault or battery or abuse of
other students, the threat of force or violence, the use or possession of alcohol
or drugs, stealing or destruction or defacing of school property or personal
property of students, the carrying or use of weapons or dangerous instruments,
or other incorrigible bad conduct on school property, as well as off school
property at school-sponsored activities, constitutes cause for suspension or
expulsion from school; and
(b) Assault or battery or abuse of school personnel; stealing or willfully or
wantonly defacing, destroying, or damaging the personal property of school
personnel on school property, off school property, or at school-sponsored
activities constitutes cause for suspension or expulsion from school.
(2) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy requiring the expulsion
from school for a period of at least twelve (12) months for a student who:
1. Is determined by the board through clear and convincing evidence to
have made threats that pose a danger to the well-being of students,
faculty, or staff of the district; or
2. Is determined by the board to have brought a weapon to a school under
its jurisdiction. In determining whether a student has brought a weapon
to school, a local board of education shall use the definition of "unlawful
possession of a weapon on school property" stated in KRS 527.070.
(b) The board shall also adopt a policy requiring disciplinary actions, up to and
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
including expulsion from school, for a student who is determined by the board
to have:
1. Possessed prescription drugs or controlled substances for the purpose of
sale or distribution at a school under the board's jurisdiction;
2. Physically assaulted or battered or abused educational personnel or other
students at a school or school function under the board's jurisdiction; or
3. Physically assaulted, battered, or abused educational personnel or other
students off school property and the incident is likely to substantially
disrupt the educational process.
(3) (a) The board may modify the expulsion requirement and length for students on a
case-by-case basis, except the length of expulsion shall be at least twelve (12)
months for a violation set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a board from expelling a student for
longer than twelve (12) months.
(c) A board that has expelled a student from the student's regular school setting
shall provide or ensure that educational services are provided to the student in
an appropriate alternative program or setting, unless the board has made a
determination, on the record, supported by clear and convincing evidence, that
the expelled student posed a threat to the safety of other students or school
staff and could not be placed into a state-funded agency program. Behavior
which constitutes a threat shall include but not be limited to the physical
assault, battery, or abuse of others; the threat of physical force; being under
the influence of drugs or alcohol; the use, possession, sale, or transfer of drugs
or alcohol; the carrying, possessing, or transfer of weapons or dangerous
instruments; and any other behavior which may endanger the safety of others.
Other intervention services as indicated for each student may be provided by
the board or by agreement with the appropriate state or community agency. A
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
state agency that provides the service shall be responsible for the cost.
(d) 1. a. In lieu of expelling a student, or upon the expiration of a student's
expulsion, a superintendent may place a student into an alternative
program or setting indefinitely if the superintendent determines
placement of the student in his or her regular school setting is
likely to substantially disrupt the education process or constitutes a
threat to the safety of other students or school staff.
b. Placements under subdivision a. of this subparagraph that
exceed one (1) calendar year shall require an annual review by
the superintendent. Significant consideration shall be given to
the safety and potential disruption to the educational process for
all students in determining whether a change in placement shall
occur.
c. Action shall not be taken under subdivision a. of this
subparagraph, and a change in placement shall not be made
under subdivision b. of this subparagraph,[The action shall not
be taken] until the parent, guardian, or other person having legal
custody or control of the student has had an opportunity to have a
hearing before the board or an appeals committee as described in
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
2. The board may adopt a policy to establish an appeals committee and
delegate the authority to hold hearings and hear appeals made under
this paragraph to that committee. Decisions of the appeals committee
may be appealed to the local board of education by the parent,
guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the
student.
3. The alternative program or setting may be provided virtually.
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
4. Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the
contrary, students placed in an alternative program or setting under this
paragraph shall be counted in attendance and membership for state
funding purposes in the same manner as other students participating in
alternative programs of the district.
5. Students placed in an alternative program or setting under this paragraph
shall be subject to compulsory attendance requirements under KRS
Chapter 159 and applicable local board policy.
6. Following the initial alternative placement of a student under this
paragraph, the board shall review the alternative program or setting
placement at least once per year and determine if the placement should
be continued in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, "charges" means substantiated behavior that falls
within the grounds for suspension or expulsion enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section, including behavior committed by a student while enrolled in a private or
public school, or in a school within another state. A school board may adopt a
policy providing that, if a student is suspended or expelled for any reason or faces
charges that may lead to suspension or expulsion but withdraws prior to a hearing
from any public or private school in this or any other state, the receiving district
may review the details of the charges, suspension, or expulsion and determine if the
student will be admitted, and if so, what conditions may be imposed upon the
admission, which may include placement of the student into an alternative program
or setting as described in subsection (3)(d) of this section.
(5) (a) School administrators, teachers, or other school personnel may immediately
remove or cause to be removed threatening or violent students from a
classroom setting or from the district transportation system pending any
further disciplinary action that may occur. Each board of education shall adopt
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
a policy to assure the implementation of this section and to assure the safety
of the students and staff.
(b) Except as described in subsection (10) of this section:
1. A principal may establish procedures for a student's removal from and
reentry to the classroom when the student's behavior disrupts the
classroom environment and education process or the student challenges
the authority of a supervising adult. In addition to removal, the student
shall be subject to further discipline for the behavior consistent with the
school's code of conduct.
2. A student who is removed from the same classroom three (3) times
within a thirty (30) day period shall be considered chronically disruptive
and may be suspended from school in accordance with this section, and
no other basis for suspension shall be deemed necessary.
3. At any time during the school year, for a student who has been removed
from the classroom under this paragraph, a principal may require a
review of the classroom issues with the teacher and the parent, guardian,
or other person having legal custody or control of the student and
determine a course of action for the teacher and student regarding the
student's continued placement in the classroom.
4. At any time during the school year, a principal may permanently remove
a student from a classroom for the remainder of the school year if the
principal determines the student's continued placement in the classroom
will chronically disrupt the education process for other students.
5. When a student is removed from a classroom under this paragraph
temporarily or permanently, the principal shall determine the placement
of the student in lieu of that classroom, which may include but is not
limited to:
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
a. Another classroom in that school; or
b. An alternative program or setting, which may be provided
virtually, as approved by the superintendent.
6. Any permanent action by a principal under this paragraph shall be
subject to an appeal process in accordance with a policy adopted by the
board.
7. Policies compliant with this paragraph shall be included in the code of
behavior and discipline adopted by the board of education under KRS
158.148 and the policies adopted by the school council under KRS
160.345.
(6) A student shall not be suspended from the common schools until after at least the
following due process procedures have been provided:
(a) The student has been given oral or written notice of the charge or charges
against him or her which constitute cause for suspension;
(b) The student has been given an explanation of the evidence of the charge or
charges if the student denies them; and
(c) The student has been given an opportunity to present his or her own version of
the facts relating to the charge or charges.
These due process procedures shall precede any suspension from the common
schools unless immediate suspension is essential to protect persons or property or to
avoid disruption of the ongoing academic process. In such cases, the due process
procedures outlined above shall follow the suspension as soon as practicable, but no
later than three (3) school days after the suspension.
(7) (a) The superintendent, principal, assistant principal, or head teacher of any
school may suspend a student but shall report the action in writing
immediately to the superintendent and to the parent, guardian, or other person
having legal custody or control of the student.
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
(b) 1. The board of education of any school district may expel or extend the
expulsion of any student for misconduct as described in subsection (1)
of this section, but the action shall not be taken until the parent,
guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student
has had an opportunity to have a hearing before the board. The decision
of the board shall be final.
2. Within thirty (30) days prior to the end of a student's expulsion, the
board shall review the details of the expulsion and current factors and
circumstances, including if ending the expulsion will substantially
disrupt the education process or constitute a threat to the safety of
students or school staff, to determine if the expulsion shall be extended
for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months.
3. The expulsion review process shall be used prior to the end of each
expulsion period until the board ends the expulsion or the student is no
longer subject to compulsory attendance under KRS 159.010.
4. Each board of education shall adopt a policy for implementation of the
process described in this paragraph.
(8) (a) Suspension of exceptional children, as defined in KRS 157.200, shall be
considered a change of educational placement if:
1. The child is removed for more than ten (10) consecutive days during a
school year; or
2. The child is subjected to a series of removals that constitute a pattern
because the removals accumulate to more than ten (10) school days
during a school year and because of other factors, such as the length of
each removal, the total amount of time the child is removed, and the
proximity of removals to one another.
(b) The admissions and release committee shall meet to review the placement and
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 21
make a recommendation for continued placement or a change in placement
and determine whether regular suspension or expulsion procedures apply.
Additional evaluations shall be completed, if necessary.
(c) If the admissions and release committee determines that an exceptional child's
behavior is related to his or her disability, the child shall not be suspended any
further or expelled unless the current placement could result in injury to the
child, other children, or the educational personnel, in which case an
appropriate alternative placement shall be provided that will provide for the
child's educational needs and will provide a safe learning and teaching
environment for all. If the admissions and release committee determines that
the behavior is not related to the disability, the local educational agency may
pursue its regular suspension or expulsion procedure for the child, if the
behavior so warrants. However, educational services shall not be terminated
during a period of expulsion and during a suspension after a student is
suspended for more than a total of ten (10) days during a school year. A
district may seek temporary injunctive relief through the courts if the parent
and the other members of the admissions and release committee cannot agree
upon a placement and the current placement will likely result in injury to the
student or others.
(9) Suspension of primary school students shall be considered only in exceptional cases
where there are safety issues for the child or others.
(10) Any action under this section related to students with disabilities shall be in
compliance with applicable federal law.
(11) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to preclude the
requirements contained in KRS 158.305 or 158.4416.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed